Utah statutes.
65A-8-210.   Fire control on state-owned lands -- Responsibilities of state agencies.

(1)  The division shall abate the public nuisance caused by uncontrolled fire on state-owned forest, range, and watershed lands.

(2) (a)  State agencies responsible for the administration of state-owned lands shall recognize the need for providing wildland fire protection and the responsibility for sharing the costs.

(b)  Those agencies shall annually allocate funds to the division in amounts as are determined to be fair and equitable proportionate costs for providing a basic level of fire protection.

(c)  The amount of protection costs shall be negotiated by the respective land agencies and the division.

